test/src/morphology/N-svad'ba_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup
Tests:
# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 

  Noun - свадьба M anim : # Noun - full paradigm
      свадьба+N+Fem+Sg+Nom: сва́дьба
      свадьба+N+Fem+Sg+Acc: сва́дьбу
      свадьба+N+Fem+Sg+Gen: сва́дьбы
      свадьба+N+Fem+Sg+Loc: сва́дьбе
      свадьба+N+Fem+Sg+Dat: сва́дьбе
      свадьба+N+Fem+Sg+Ins: сва́дьбой
      свадьба+N+Fem+Pl+Nom: сва́дьбы
      свадьба+N+Fem+Pl+Acc+Inan: сва́дьбы
      свадьба+N+Fem+Pl+Gen: сва́деб
      свадьба+N+Fem+Pl+Loc: сва́дьбах
      свадьба+N+Fem+Pl+Dat: сва́дьбам
      свадьба+N+Fem+Pl+Ins: сва́дьбами
